Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-138
Assistance; denial; termination; reduction; notice; hearing.

Any person whose application for assistance, made pursuant to section 68-104 or sections 68-131 to 68-148, is denied or whose continuing assistance is terminated or reduced shall, at the time of the denial, termination, or reduction, be given a written notice of the specific reasons for such denial, termination, or reduction. Such notice shall also inform the person of the right to a hearing to review the denial, termination, or reduction and the procedures for requesting such hearing.

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 8;

Laws 1984, LB 886, § 4.